cs: Design hlavice šťouchadla: Spirála; Elektrický nástavec; Mřížka; Děrovaný disk; Hladká plocha; Vlna; Drát; Jiné
it: Modello della testa dello schiacciapatate: A spirale; Attacco elettrico; Griglia; Piastra forata; Piastra liscia; Onda; Filo; Altro
pl: Konstrukcja główki tłuczka do ziemniaków: Zwijane; Nasadka elektryczna; Kratka; Płytka perforowana; Płytka gładka; Falowane; Druciane; Pozostałe
hr-HR: Dizajn glave gnječilice: Spiralno; Električni nastavak; Rešetkasto; Perforirana ploča; Ravna glava; Valovi; Žičani; Ostalo
fi: Perunasurvimen pään muotoilu: Kierteinen; Sähköinen kiinnitys; Ruudukko; Reikälevy; Sileä levy; Aalto; Lanka; Muu
hu: Törőfej kialakítása: Tekercselt; Elektromos tartozék; Rácsos; Perforált lemez; Sima lemez; Hullámos; Drót; Egyéb
zh-TW: 搗碎器頭部設計: 盤繞; 電動配件; 網格; 穿孔板; 光滑板; 波形; 線圈; 其他
de: Stampferkopfdesign: Gewickelt; Elektrischer Aufsatz; Gitter; Lochplatte; Glatte Platte; Welle; Draht; Sonstiges
es: Diseño del cabezal triturador: En espiral; Accesorio eléctrico; Rejilla; Placa perforada; Placa lisa; Onda; Alambre; Otros
tr: Ezici başlık tasarımı: Sarmal; Elektrikli aparat; Izgara; Delikli plaka; Düz plaka; Dalgalı; Tel örgü; Diğer
fr: Conception de la tête du presse-purée: Enroulé; Accessoire électrique; Grillagé; Plaque perforée; Plaque lisse; Ondulé; Fil de fer; Autre
sv: Design för potatisstöt: Ringad; Elektrisk redskap; Rutnät; Perforerad platta; Slät platta; Våg; Tråd; Övrigt
lt-LT: Grūstuvo galvutės dizainas: Susuktas; Elektrinis priedas; Languota; Perforuota plokštė; Lygi plokštė; Bangelė; Viela; Kita
vi: Thiết kế đầu dụng cụ nghiền: Xoắn lò xo; Bộ phận điện; Kẻ ô; Tấm đục lỗ; Tấm bề mặt nhẵn; Gợn sóng; Dây điện; Khác
zh-CN: 捣碎器压头设计: 螺旋形; 电动附件; 网格形; 多孔板; 光滑板; 波浪形; 金属丝; 其他
el: Σχεδιασμός κεφαλής πρέσας (πουρέ): Σπειροειδές; Ηλεκτρικό εξάρτημα; Πλέγμα; Διάτρητη πλάκα; Λεία πλάκα; Κυματιστό; Συρμάτινο; Άλλο
nl: Ontwerp van stamperkop: Opgerold; Elektrische aansluiting; Rooster; Geperforeerde plaat; Gladde plaat; Golf; Draad; Overig
pt-BR: Design da cabeça do espremedor: Enrolado; Conexão elétrica; Grade; Placa perfurada; Placa lisa; Ondulado; Fio; Outro
bg-BG: Дизайн на главата на пасатора: Навито; Електрическо прикрепване; Решетка; Перфорирана плоча; Гладка плоча; Вълна; Тел; Друго
ro-RO: Design al capului de pasator: Elicoidal; Accesoriu electric; Grilă; Placă perforată; Placă netedă; Ondulat; Sârmă; Altele
ru: Конструкция рабочей части толкушки: Спиральная; Электрическая насадка; Решетчатая; Перфорированная пластина; Гладкая пластина; Волнообразная; Проволочная; Другая
th: การออกแบบหัวบด: ขด; แบบใช้งานร่วมกับอุปกรณ์ไฟฟ้า; กริด; แบบแผ่นเจาะรู; แบบแผ่นเรียบ; คลื่น; ลวด; อื่นๆ
ja: マッシャーヘッドのデザイン: コイル状; 電動アタッチメント; グリッド; 多孔プレート; スムーズプレート; ウェーブ; ワイヤー; その他
en: Masher head design: Coiled; Electric attachment; Grid; Perforated plate; Smooth plate; Wave; Wire; Other
ko: 매셔 헤드 디자인: 코일; 전동 부착형; 그리드; 타공판; 무타공; 웨이브; 와이어; 기타
pt-PT: Desig da cabeça do esmagador: Enrolado; Conexão elétrica; Grelha; Chapa perfurada; Placa lisa; Onda; Arame; Outro
sk-SK: Dizajn hlavy roztláčača: Špirálová; Elektrický nadstavec; Mriežkovaná; Perforovaná platňa; Hladká platňa; Vlnitá; Drôt; Iné
nb: Mosehodedesign: Kveilet; Elektrisk tilbehør; Nett; Perforert plate; Glatt plate; Bølge; Metalltråd; Annet
sl-SI: Zasnova glave tlačilca: Spiralni; Električni priključek; Mrežast; Perforirana plošča; Gladka plošča; Valovi; Žica; Druga
da: Mosestavhoveds design: Oprullet; Elektrisk tilbehør; Gitter; Perforeret plade; Glat plade; Bølge; Tråd; Andet